Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.567

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—Review of existing licensing standards by department of early learning—Preapproval under existing licensing standards.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1314.SL) ***

The *department of early learning, in consultation with stakeholders, shall review existing licensing standards including, but not limited to, plumbing, fixtures, and playground equipment, related to facility requirements to eliminate potential barriers to licensing while ensuring the health and safety of children in early learning programs. The department must create a process by which projects for eligible organizations and school districts receiving grants or loans from the early learning facilities revolving account or the early learning facilities development account created in RCW 43.31.569 can be preapproved under existing licensing standards related to facility requirements. The licensing standards accepted in the preapproval are the licensing standards that must be met upon project completion.

[2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The department of early learning was abolished and its powers, duties, and functions were transferred to the department of children, youth, and families by 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 802, effective July 1, 2018.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.